Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 21.1 Registration and Voting in Federal Elections by Citizens Residing Outside the United States

17-21.1-1.
Applicability.

This chapter is enacted pursuant to Public Law 94-203, passed by the congress of the United States and approved on January 2, 1976, and applies to all federal elections to select, nominate, and/or elect candidates for president, vice-president, presidential electors, members of the United States senate, and members of the United States house of representatives.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 258, § 1.

17-21.1-2.
Absentee registration.

Any person otherwise qualified pursuant to this title who is a citizen of the United States and is absent from this state and residing outside the United States shall have the right to register absentee and vote by an absentee ballot in any federal election in this state in any election district of this state in which the person was last domiciled immediately prior to that person’s departure from the United States, notwithstanding that the person does not have a place of abode or other address in this state, and the person’s intent to return to this state may be uncertain, if:

The person has registered pursuant to the provisions of §

17-20-6.1

;

The person does not maintain a domicile, is not registered to vote, and does not vote in any other state or election district of a state or territory, or in any territory or possession of the United States; and

The person has a valid passport or card of identity and registration issued under the authority of the secretary of state of the United States.

If the person is a United States citizen and has never lived in the United States, but has a parent who is a qualified elector pursuant to this chapter, then that person shall be eligible to register and vote in federal elections where his or her parent is a qualified elector.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 354, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 396, § 2.

17-21.1-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 9; P.L. 1999, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 47; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 354, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 396, § 3, effective July 19, 2005.

17-21.1-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 357, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 354, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 396, § 3, effective July 19, 2005.

17-21.1-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 252, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 354, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 396, § 3, effective July 19, 2005.

17-21.1-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 258, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 354, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 396, § 3, effective July 19, 2005.

17-21.1-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 258, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 354, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 396, § 3, effective July 19, 2005.